Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2622
Program; financial
assistance; number of students.

Annual financial
payments made under sections 38-2620 to 38-2623 shall be limited to students
who participated in or were
accepted into the program in the academic year 2010-11 and shall
continue for the remaining academic year or years that any such student is
enrolled in an accredited school or college of optometry subject to the limitation
provided in section 38-2623.

Laws 1974, LB 911, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136.07;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 895;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB637, § 23.